Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB759.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102(z.5) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *(z.5) The words "proof of identification" shall mean:[(1) In the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a valid-without-photo driver's license or a valid-without-photo identification card issued by the Department of Transportation.(2) For an elector who appears to vote under section 1210, a document that:(i) shows the name of the individual to whom the document was issued and the name substantially conforms to the name of the individual as it appears in the district register;(ii) shows a photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued;(iii) includes an expiration date and is not expired, except:(A) for a document issued by the Department of Transportation which is not more than twelve (12) months past the expiration date; or(B) in the case of a document from an agency of the Armed forces of the United States or their reserve components, including the Pennsylvania National Guard, establishing that the elector is a current member of or a veteran of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard which does not designate a specific date on which the document expires, but includes a designation that the expiration date is indefinite; and(iv) was issued by one of the following:(A) The United States Government.(B) The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(C) A municipality of this Commonwealth to an employee of that municipality.20250HB0759PN0783 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) An accredited Pennsylvania public or private institution of higher learning.(E) A Pennsylvania care facility.(3) For a qualified absentee elector under section 1301 or a qualified mail-in elector under section 1301-D:(i) in the case of an elector who has been issued a current and valid driver's license, the elector's driver's license number;(ii) in the case of an elector who has not been issued a current and valid driver's license, the last four digits of the elector's Social Security number;(iii) in the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a copy of a document that satisfies paragraph (1); or(iv) in the case of an elector who has not been issued a current and valid driver's license or Social Security number, a copy of a document that satisfies paragraph (2).](1) In the case of any elector, at least one of the following:(i) the elector's driver's license;(ii) in the case of an elector who has a religious objection to being photographed, a copy of a valid-without-photo driver's license or a valid-without-photo identification card issued by the Department of Transportation;(iii) the elector's voter registration card with scannable identification number and a copy of the elector's signature, as issued by a county under section 302;(iv) a document from an agency of the armed forces of the United States or their reserve components, including the Pennsylvania National Guard, establishing that the elector is a 20250HB0759PN0783 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current member of or a veteran of the United States Armed Forces or National Guard which does not designate a specific date on which the document expires, but includes a designation that that expiration date is indefinite;(v) a document issued by the secretary under section 201(i);(vi) an affidavit provided to an elector by elections officers, on which the elector shall affirm the elector's identity, including the elector's signature and the last four digits of the elector's Social Security number. The affidavit shall include disclosure of the penalties under section 1802; or(vii) a document that shows the name and photograph of the individual to whom the document was issued, includes an expiration date and is not expired and is issued by one of the following:(A) The United States Government.(B) The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(C) A municipality of this Commonwealth to an employe of that municipality.(D) An accredited public or private institution of higher learning located in this Commonwealth.(E) A care facility located in this Commonwealth.(2) (Reserved).* * *Section 2. Sections 201 and 302 of the act are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 201. Powers and Duties of the Secretary of the Commonwealth.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall exercise in the manner provided by this act all powers granted to him by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon him by this act, which shall include the following:20250HB0759PN0783 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(i) To provide to any registered elector upon request, and free of charge, a durable photo identification card which may be used for the purposes of voting.Section 302. Powers and Duties of County Boards.--The county boards of elections, within their respective counties, shall exercise, in the manner provided by this act, all powers granted to them by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon them by this act, which shall include the following:* * *(q) To provide to each registered elector in a county, within one year of the effective date of this subsection and upon new or updated registration after the effective date of this subsection, or at the request of an elector, a durable voter registration card, including a scannable identification code and a likeness of a registered elector's signature. A county board of elections shall investigate the circumstances of any registration card returned as undeliverable by the United States Postal Service. The investigation shall include contacting the applicant, further attempts to have the applicant's registration card delivered and the correction or reconsideration of the applicant's registration status and registered address, if found to be incorrect.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0759PN0783 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324